District of Columbia statutes.
2-360.02

Terms and qualifications of members.

(a)

(1)

The term of office of the chairperson and other full-time members of the Board shall be 4 years, except that in making the initial appointment, the Mayor shall appoint one members for a term of one year, one member for a term of 2 years, and the chairperson for a term of 3 years. The terms of the chairperson and members first appointed shall begin on the date that a majority of the first members are sworn in, which shall become the anniversary date for all subsequent appointments. Thereafter, their successors shall be appointed for terms of 4 years, or for the balance of any unexpired term, but members may continue to serve beyond their terms until their successors take office.

(2)

The Mayor shall endeavor to nominate persons for appointment to the Board at least 30 days before the expiration of a member’s term.

(3)

Members may be reappointed for succeeding terms.

(4)

If there is no chairperson, or if the chairperson is absent or unable to serve, the member senior in length of service shall be acting chairperson.

(b)

The chairperson and members of the Board shall be attorneys licensed to practice law in the District who shall have no less than 5 years experience in public contract law. All members of the Board shall have experience in the areas of procurement and contract law.

(c)

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, current members of the Contract Appeals Board, appointed pursuant to the District of Columbia Procurement Practices Act of 1985, effective February 21, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-85; 32 DCR 7396) [§ 2-301.01 et seq.], serving on April 8, 2011, shall be considered qualified and may continue to serve as members of the Board.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1002, 58 DCR 1185
2001 Ed., § 2-309.02.